Utah statutes.
31A-30-102.   Purpose statement.

The purpose of this chapter is to:

(1)  prevent abusive rating practices;

(2)  require disclosure of rating practices to purchasers;

(3)  establish rules regarding:

(a)  a universal individual and small group application; and

(b)  renewability of coverage;

(4)  improve the overall fairness and efficiency of the individual and small group insurance market;

(5)  provide increased access for individuals and small employers to health insurance; and

(6)  provide an employer with the opportunity to establish a defined contribution arrangement for an employee to purchase a health benefit plan through the Internet portal created by Section 63M-1-2504.

